Cellar/aspell/0.60.8/lib/aspell-0.60/eo_affix.dat
# Built from eo.aff by means of ispellaff2myspell by Agustin Martin
# Original Copyright notice for eo.aff follows (with dates fixed)
# ------------------------------------------------------------------
#
# Nomo:         eo.aff
# Funkcio:      Afiksaro por Eo-vortaro
# Komencita:    1997-08-30 de Sergio Pokrovskij <pok@el.nips.nsk.su>
# Versio 2.1.
# Lasta sxangxo:
#               Time-stamp: <2000-02-25 12:31:17 pok>
#
# Copyright 1997-2000 Sergio Pokrovskij
#
#  This file is available on the terms of GNU General Public License
#  (Free Software Foundation, 675 Mass Ave, Cambridge, MA 02139, USA).
# -------------------------------------------------------------------

SET ISO8859-3
TRY anieotrlsdjkgmupbvfĝczŝ'ĉŭĵhĥ-TASKMBENPLHIGVRJFDUOCĈZĜĤŜWXQYwyĴ


PFX E Y 1
PFX E   0     ne          .

PFX M Y 1
PFX M   0     mal         .

PFX N Y 19
PFX N   0     unu         .
PFX N   0     neunu       .
PFX N   0     du          .
PFX N   0     ambaŭ       .
PFX N   0     tri         .
PFX N   0     kvar        .
PFX N   0     kvin        .
PFX N   0     ses         .
PFX N   0     sep         .
PFX N   0     ok          .
PFX N   0     naŭ         .
PFX N   0     dek         .
PFX N   0     cent        .
PFX N   0     mil         .
PFX N   0     kelk        .
PFX N   0     dekkelk     .
PFX N   0     plur        .
PFX N   0     mult        [aeijou]
PFX N   0     multe       [^aeijou]

PFX R Y 1
PFX R   0     re          .

SFX A Y 14
SFX A   a     e           a
SFX A   0     j           a
SFX A   0     jn          a
SFX A   0     n           a
SFX A   i     a           i
SFX A   i     aj          i
SFX A   i     ajn         i
SFX A   i     an          i
SFX A   i     e           i
SFX A   o     a           o
SFX A   o     aj          o
SFX A   o     ajn         o
SFX A   o     an          o
SFX A   o     e           o

SFX B Y 14
SFX B   a     ema         a
SFX B   a     emaj        a
SFX B   a     emajn       a
SFX B   a     eman        a
SFX B   a     eme         a
SFX B   a     emo         a
SFX B   a     emon        a
SFX B   i     ema         i
SFX B   i     emaj        i
SFX B   i     emajn       i
SFX B   i     eman        i
SFX B   i     eme         i
SFX B   i     emo         i
SFX B   i     emon        i

SFX C Y 14
SFX C   a     eca         a
SFX C   a     ecaj        a
SFX C   a     ecajn       a
SFX C   a     ecan        a
SFX C   a     ece         a
SFX C   a     eco         a
SFX C   a     econ        a
SFX C   i     eca         i
SFX C   i     ecaj        i
SFX C   i     ecajn       i
SFX C   i     ecan        i
SFX C   i     ece         i
SFX C   i     eco         i
SFX C   i     econ        i

SFX D Y 30
SFX D   a     inda        a
SFX D   a     indaj       a
SFX D   a     indajn      a
SFX D   a     indan       a
SFX D   a     inde        a
SFX D   a     indo        a
SFX D   a     indon       a
SFX D   a     indaĵo      a
SFX D   a     indaĵoj     a
SFX D   a     indaĵojn    a
SFX D   a     indaĵon     a
SFX D   a     indas       a
SFX D   a     indis       a
SFX D   a     indos       a
SFX D   a     indus       a
SFX D   0     nda         i
SFX D   0     ndaj        i
SFX D   0     ndajn       i
SFX D   0     ndan        i
SFX D   0     nde         i
SFX D   0     ndo         i
SFX D   0     ndon        i
SFX D   0     ndaĵo       i
SFX D   0     ndaĵoj      i
SFX D   0     ndaĵojn     i
SFX D   0     ndaĵon      i
SFX D   0     ndas        i
SFX D   0     ndi         i
SFX D   0     ndos        i
SFX D   0     ndus        i

SFX E Y 9
SFX E   a     e           a
SFX E   0     j           a
SFX E   0     jn          a
SFX E   0     n           a
SFX E   o     a           o
SFX E   o     aj          o
SFX E   o     ajn         o
SFX E   o     an          o
SFX E   o     e           o

SFX F Y 61
SFX F   a     e           a
SFX F   a     ine         a
SFX F   a     ina         a
SFX F   a     inaj        a
SFX F   a     inajn       a
SFX F   a     inan        a
SFX F   0     j           a
SFX F   0     jn          a
SFX F   0     n           a
SFX F   a     ino         a
SFX F   a     inoj        a
SFX F   a     inojn       a
SFX F   a     inon        a
SFX F   a     o           a
SFX F   a     oj          a
SFX F   a     ojn         a
SFX F   a     on          a
SFX F   e     ine         e
SFX F   e     ina         e
SFX F   e     inaj        e
SFX F   e     inajn       e
SFX F   e     inan        e
SFX F   e     ino         e
SFX F   e     inoj        e
SFX F   e     inojn       e
SFX F   e     inon        e
SFX F   i     a           i
SFX F   i     aj          i
SFX F   i     ajn         i
SFX F   i     an          i
SFX F   i     e           i
SFX F   i     o           i
SFX F   i     oj          i
SFX F   i     ojn         i
SFX F   i     on          i
SFX F   0     ne          i
SFX F   0     na          i
SFX F   0     naj         i
SFX F   0     najn        i
SFX F   0     nan         i
SFX F   0     no          i
SFX F   0     noj         i
SFX F   0     nojn        i
SFX F   0     non         i
SFX F   o     a           o
SFX F   o     aj          o
SFX F   o     ajn         o
SFX F   o     an          o
SFX F   o     e           o
SFX F   o     ine         o
SFX F   o     ina         o
SFX F   o     inaj        o
SFX F   o     inajn       o
SFX F   o     inan        o
SFX F   o     ino         o
SFX F   o     inoj        o
SFX F   o     inojn       o
SFX F   o     inon        o
SFX F   0     j           o
SFX F   0     jn          o
SFX F   0     n           o
